Hawaii statutes.
§448E-4 Powers and duties of board. In
addition to any other powers and duties authorized by law, the board shall have
all the powers and duties necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate
this chapter, including but not limited to the following powers and duties:

(1) To grant licenses which shall be renewable for:

(A) Journey worker electricians;

(B) Journey worker specialty electricians;

(C) Supervising electricians;

(D) Supervising specialty electricians;

(E) Master plumbers;

(F) Journey worker plumbers;

(G) Maintenance electricians;

(H) Journey worker industrial electricians;
and

(I) Supervising industrial electricians;

(2) To adopt, amend, or repeal rules in accordance
with chapter 91 as it may deem proper to effectuate this chapter and to insure
the safety and welfare of the general public; provided that the rules may
forbid acts or practices deemed by the board to be detrimental to the
accomplishment of the purpose of this chapter;

(3) To enforce this chapter and rules adopted
pursuant to this chapter and chapter 91, including the denial, suspension, or
revocation of any license; and

(4) To examine all applicants and licensees to
determine their qualifications prior to the issuance or renewal of licenses. [L
1971, c 183, pt of §1; am L 1972, c 196, §2; am L 1978, c 99, §1; am L 1979, c
105, §43; am L 1982, c 205, §2; am L 1983, c 56, §3; am L 1992, c 202, §80; gen
ch 1993; am L 1994, c 215, §3]

Attorney General Opinions

Applications for licenses are not public records within
meaning of §92-50 and are not open for public inspection. Att. Gen. Op. 75-7.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next